Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 14. Economic Development and Stabilization Board [Repealed]

§§ 9-2-1401 through 9-2-1409.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to the transfer of duties to the Wyoming Business Council, see §

9-12-101

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 235, § 1, related to the Economic Development and Stabilization Board.